Utah statutes.
11-42-415.   Pledge and use of improvement revenues -- Reducing installment
payments -- Notice -- Overpayment of installment.
(1)  A local entity may, by resolution adopted by the governing body, provide
for the pledge and use of any improvement revenues to pay:
(a)  some or all of the costs and expenses of making, operating, and
maintaining improvements, to the extent permitted under this chapter; and
(b)  some or all of the principal of and interest on assessment bonds, interim
warrants, and bond anticipation notes issued against the assessment area to
make improvements within the assessment area.
(2) (a)  If the governing body adopts a resolution under Subsection (1), the
local entity:
(i)  may:
(A)  provide for assessments to be levied in the full amount of the estimated
cost of the improvements, as determined by a project engineer;
(B)  agree to use installment payments from assessments to pay the costs of
the improvements and to pay principal of and interest on any assessment bonds,
interim warrants, and bond anticipation notes when due; and
(C)  reduce installment payments, as provided in Subsection (2)(a)(ii), if the
local entity receives net improvement revenues and pledges them to pay
operation and maintenance costs of the improvements and to pay principal of
and interest on assessment bonds, interim warrants, or bond anticipation
notes; and
(ii)  shall authorize a local entity official to:
(A)  determine on each installment payment date the amount of net improvement
revenues that the local entity has received since the last installment payment
date; and
(B)  reduce the amount of the installment payment due on the next succeeding
installment payment date by an amount that is no greater than the amount of
the net improvement revenues described in Subsection (2)(a)(ii)(A).
(b)  A local entity may not reduce installment payments under Subsection
(2)(a)(ii) if:
(i)  the reduction exceeds the amount of net improvement revenues that have
been pledged to pay:
(A)  operation and maintenance costs of the improvements; and
(B)  principal of and interest on assessment bonds, interim warrants, and bond
anticipation notes; or
(ii)  after the reduction, the sum of the assessment installment payments and
the net improvement revenues are insufficient to pay:
(A)  operation and maintenance costs of the improvements; and
(B)  principal of and interest on assessment bonds, interim warrants, and bond
anticipation notes.
(c)  The local entity shall require that each reduction of installment
payments be made so that the assessments levied against each assessed property
receive a proportionate share of the reduction.
(d)  A reduction under Subsection (2)(a)(ii) does not apply to an assessment
or interest on an assessment that has been paid.
(3) (a)  Not more than 14 days after making a determination under Subsection
(2)(a)(ii) to reduce an installment payment, the local entity's governing body
shall mail notice of the reduction to each owner of property within the
assessment area at the property owner's mailing address.
(b)  The governing body may include the notice required under Subsection
(3)(a) with or in any other notice regarding the payment of assessments and
interest on assessments that the governing body sends to owners.
(4) (a)  If an owner of assessed property pays more than the amount of the
reduced installment payment on the installment payment date after a notice
under Subsection (3) is mailed, the local entity may, by following the
procedure under Subsection (3), provide additional notice to the owner that:
(i)  the owner has overpaid the assessment installment payment; and
(ii)  the local entity will:
(A)  credit the amount of the overpayment against the next installment payment
due; or
(B)  if no further installment payment is due, refund the amount of the
overpayment upon receipt of a written refund request from the owner.
(b)  If a local entity receives an overpayment of an installment payment, it
shall:
(i)  credit the amount of the overpayment against the next installment payment
due; or
(ii)  refund the amount of the overpayment to the owner if:
(A)  no further installment payment is due; and
(B)  the owner submits a written request for a refund.
(c)  A local entity is not required to pay interest on an overpayment that it
holds.
